Utah statutes.
35A-8-1605.   Powers.

(1)  The board may:

(a)  appoint a hearing examiner or administrative law judge with authority to conduct any hearings, make determinations, and enter appropriate findings of facts, conclusions of law, and orders under authority of the Interlocal Cooperation Act; and

(b)  make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, if necessary to perform its responsibilities.

(2)  The board shall:

(a)  be subject to the procedures and requirements under Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act; and

(b)  be subject to the procedures and requirements under Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

